Texas, session 891, SB39.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Subchapter E, Chapter 443, Health and Safety Code, is amended by adding Sections 443.2055 and 443.2056 to read as follows: Sec. 443.2055.  OFFENSE: MARKETING OR PACKAGING OF CONSUMABLE HEMP PRODUCT IN MANNER ATTRACTIVE TO MINORS. (a)  In this section, "minor" means a person younger than 21 years of age. (b)  A person commits an offense if the person markets, advertises, sells, or causes to be sold an edible consumable hemp product containing a hemp-derived cannabinoid that: (1)  is in the shape of a human, animal, fruit, or cartoon or in another shape that is attractive to minors; or (2)  is in packaging or a container that: (A)  is in the shape of a human, animal, fruit, or cartoon or in another shape that is attractive to minors; (B)  depicts an image of a human, animal, fruit, or cartoon or another image that is attractive to minors; (C)  imitates or mimics trademarks or trade dress of products that are or have been primarily marketed to minors; (D)  includes a symbol that is primarily used to market products to minors; (E)  includes an image of a celebrity; or (F)  includes an image that resembles a food product, including candy or juice. (c)  In this section, a cartoon includes a depiction of an object, person, animal, creature, or any similar caricature that: (1)  uses comically exaggerated features and attributes; (2)  assigns human characteristics to animals, plants, or other objects; or (3)  has unnatural or extra-human abilities, such as imperviousness to pain or injury, x-ray vision, tunneling at very high speeds, or transformation. (d)  An offense under this section is a Class A misdemeanor. Sec. 443.2056.  OFFENSE: MISLEADING CONSUMABLE HEMP PACKAGING.  (a)  A person commits an offense if the person sells or offers for sale a consumable hemp product that contains or is marketed as containing hemp-derived cannabinoids in a package that depicts any statement, artwork, or design that would likely mislead a person to believe: (1)  the package does not contain a hemp-derived cannabinoid; or (2)  the product is intended for medical use, including by depicting a green cross. (b)  An offense under this section is a Class A misdemeanor. SECTION 2.  This Act takes effect December 1, 2025.